South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3727.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 2-13-90 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 2-13-90. If at any time the supplement of any volume of the Code of Laws shall, in the judgment of the Council and the Code Commissioner, become too bulky for convenient use, the Council and the Code Commissioner shall contract to be prepared and published under theirhis supervision and direction, and submit to the General Assembly for its consideration, a revised volume setting forth the contents of the original volume revised and codified to include the effect of such cumulative pocket supplement; and the General Assembly, having considered and approved such revised volume shall, by bill passed under the formalities prescribed by the Constitution of South Carolina for the passage of laws, declare such that the revised volume to be is substituted for the original volume as a part of the then existing Code of Laws, and, to the extent of its contents, is the only general permanent statutory law of the State.  All replacement volumes shall include an annotation to any general permanent statutory law which is impliedly repealed and must be included as it had been previously printed in the Cumulative Supplement it replaced. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----